Massachusetts, session 194th, H3575.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 21 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(g) The Mass Save program shall offer to a customer a point-of-sale rebate for any heat
pump for which the customer otherwise qualifies.
of 1